nb: Buehårmateriale: Horsehair; Nylon; Syntetisk; Annet
cs: Materiál tětivy: Koňské žíně; Nylon; Syntetické; Jiné
en: Bow hair material: Horsehair; Nylon; Synthetic; Other
hr-HR: Materijal strune gudala: Konjska dlaka; Najlon; Sintetika; Ostalo
lt-LT: Smičiaus stygų medžiaga: Ašutinis audinys; Nailonas; Sintetika; Kita
pt-PT: Material do laço para o cabelo: Crina de cavalo; Náilon; Sintético; Outro
fr: Matériau du nœud pour cheveux: Crin de cheval; Nylon; Synthétique; Autre
ro-RO: Material fir arcuș: Păr de cal; Nailon; Sintetic; Altele
ja: ボウヘア素材: ホースヘア; ナイロン; 合成品; その他
th: วัสดุที่ใช้ทำโบว์ผม: ขนม้า; ไนลอน; สังเคราะห์; อื่นๆ
vi: Vật liệu nơ kẹp tóc: Lông ngựa; Nylon; Tổng hợp; Khác
ru: Материал волоса для смычков: Конский волос; Нейлон; Синтетика; Другое
tr: Fiyonk saç malzemesi: At saçı; Plastik; Sentetik; Diğer
zh-TW: 蝴蝶結毛材質: 馬毛; 尼龍; 合成; 其他
it: Materiale delle corde dell'arco: Crine di cavallo; Nylon; Sintetico; Altro
sk-SK: Materiál vlákna sláčika: Konské vlásie; Nylon; Syntetický; Iné
nl: Materiaal booghaar: Paardenhaar; Nylon; Synthetisch; Andere
zh-CN: 弓毛材质: 马鬃; 尼龙; 合成; 其他
fi: Rusetin hiusmateriaali: Jouhi; Nailon; Synteettinen; Muu
pl: Materiał włosia do łuku: Włosie końskie; Nylon; Syntetyczne; Inne
bg-BG: Материал на косата за лъка: Конски косъм; Найлон; Синтетичен; Други
da: Buehårsmateriale: Horsehair; Nylon; Syntetisk; Andet
el: Υλικό τρίχας δοξαριού: Αλογότριχες; Νάιλον; Συνθετικό; Άλλο
pt-BR: Material da fibra para arco: Pelo de cavalo; Nylon; Sintético; Outro
sl-SI: Material žime godalnega loka: Konjska žima; Najlon; Sintetika; Drugo
hu: Vonószőr anyaga: Lószőr; Nejlon; Szintetikus; Egyéb
es: Material del lazo para el pelo: Horsehair; Nylon; Sintético; Otros
de: Bogenhaarmaterial: Horsehair; Nylon; Synthetisch; Sonstiges
sv: Hårrosett - material: Hästhår; Nylon; Syntetisk; Övrigt
ko: 활털 소재: 말총; 나일론; 인조; 기타